Mississippi, session 2026, HB1487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 75-75-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-75-101. (1)  Boxing, sparring and * * * wrestling matches and exhibitions for percentage of gate receipts where an admission fee is charged are hereby allowed.  All boxing, sparring and * * *wrestling matches and exhibitions authorized herein shall be held under the supervision of and subject to the rules and regulations of the Mississippi Athletic Commission, and in strict compliance with the provisions of this article.  No boxing or sparring match or exhibition shall exceed fifteen (15) rounds of three (3) minutes each, and the charge for each seat or ticket shall be left to the discretion of the commission. (2) For the purposes of this chapter, "tough-man contest" and kickboxing competition shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Athletic Commission. SECTION 2.  Section 75-75-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-75-105.  The commission shall have a seal and shall have and is hereby vested with the sole direction, management, control and jurisdiction over all boxing, sparring * * *and wrestling matches or exhibitions to be conducted, held or given within the State of Mississippi.  The commission has full power and authority and it shall be its duty: (a) to make and publish rules and regulations governing the conduct of boxing, sparring and * * *wrestling matches and exhibitions, the time and place thereof, and the prices charged for admission thereto; (b) to accept application for and, in its discretion, order a license or permit issued to promoters and participants of these events, and to revoke the license or permit; (c) to collect through the recorder of permits and licenses a fee of six percent (6%) of the gross receipts of every boxing, sparring or * * * wrestling match or exhibition, and a reasonable fee not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each annual license or permit issued to a boxer, * * * wrestler, referee, judge, matchmaker, promoter, manager, trainer, second, director, or timekeeper; and (d) to revoke any license or permit when, in its judgment, the public welfare requires it.  The commission is prohibited from issuing regulations which may be construed as granting a franchised or exclusive territory, and from the issuing of any type of monopolistic license or permit. SECTION 3.  Section 75-75-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-75-109.  The commission may appoint and remove at pleasure, such number of inspectors of athletics as in its judgment is necessary to aid in the proper discharge of its duties.  Compensation may be paid an inspector as the commission may determine, but he shall be paid, when ordered to attend a match or exhibition, his actual traveling expenses in the same way and manner as expenses of members of the commission are paid.  It shall be the duty of the commission, either by one of its members or by a duly appointed inspector, to attend every boxing, * * *wrestling or sparring match or exhibition held in the State of Mississippi.  The commission may appoint and remove at pleasure, a secretary to the commission, who shall perform such duties as the commission may prescribe, and who shall keep a full, complete and up-to-date record of all proceedings of said commission, including all licenses and all sums collected, and make a report thereof to the State Auditor annually, on or before the fifteenth day of January in each year. SECTION 4.  Section 75-75-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-75-115.  All contracts relating to the holding or staging of any boxing, * * *wrestling, or sparring match or exhibition in Mississippi, or relating to any participation therein, shall contain a provision to the effect that all rules passed or adopted by the commission, either before or after the execution of the contract, shall be considered as a part of the contract, the same as if said rules were fully set out in the body of the instrument. SECTION 5.  Section 75-75-117, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-75-117. Any person who shall voluntarily engage in a pugilistic encounter * * *, wrestling match or exhibition, for money or any other things of value, or for which an admission fee is charged, either directly or indirectly, or any person who shall be concerned directly or indirectly in the promotion of any boxing, * * *wrestling, or sparring match or exhibition, or any person who acts or attempts to act as referee, judge, matchmaker, promoter, manager, trainer, director, second or timekeeper in connection with any boxing, * * *wrestling or sparring match or exhibition in this state without first having obtained a license or permit from the commission, on conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in the Penitentiary not less than one (1) year; or by fine not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00); or by imprisonment in the county jail not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months; or by both such fine and imprisonment. SECTION 6.  Section 75-75-123, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-75-123.  Boxing, sparring and wrestling matches in colleges, universities or high schools shall be exempted from the jurisdiction of the commission herein created and shall be permitted and supervised by the governing body of such high school, college or university. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.